Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1186.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Chapter 87 of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SUBCHAPTER COFFICE OF ATTORNEY GENERALSec.8731. Scope of subchapter.8732. Definitions.8733. Adjunct Prosecutor Division.8734. Request for assistance.8735. Assignment of adjunct prosecutor.8736. Terms of assistance.8737. Scope of authority.1234567891011121314151617181920 8738. Standing.8739. Adjunct Prosecutor Division Restricted Account.§ 8731. Scope of subchapter.This subchapter relates to the Office of Attorney General.§ 8732. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Account." The Adjunct Prosecutor Division Restricted Account established in this subchapter."Adjunct prosecutor." An adjunct prosecutor of the division."Attorney General." The Attorney General of the Commonwealth."District attorney." A district attorney in this Commonwealth."Division." The Adjunct Prosecutor Division established in this subchapter.§ 8733. Adjunct Prosecutor Division.The Adjunct Prosecutor Division is established in the Office of Attorney General. The purpose of the division is to assist district attorneys with the investigation and prosecution of criminal matters as provided in this subchapter.§ 8734. Request for assistance.A district attorney may request that the division provide an adjunct prosecutor to assist in the investigation or prosecution of a criminal matter under the laws of this Commonwealth.§ 8735. Assignment of adjunct prosecutor.Following receipt of a request under section 8734 (relating to request for assistance), the division may assign an adjunct prosecutor to temporarily serve under the direction of the 20250HB1186PN1335 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 requesting district attorney.§ 8736. Terms of assistance.The Attorney General shall specify the term of assistance for an adjunct prosecutor assigned under section 8735 (relating to assignment of adjunct prosecutor).§ 8737. Scope of authority.(a) Qualification required.--An adjunct prosecutor must be a member in good standing of the bar of this Commonwealth.(b) Powers and duties.--An adjunct prosecutor's investigative and prosecutorial powers and duties may include, but not be limited to, with the consent and under the direction of the district attorney, the following:(1) Conducting proceedings before grand juries.(2) Participating in court proceedings and engaging in litigation, including a civil and criminal matter, that a requesting district attorney deems necessary.(3) Reviewing documentary evidence available from any source.(4) Making applications to a State court for a grant of immunity to a witness, consistent with applicable statutory requirements, or for a warrant, subpoena or other court order.(c) Other powers.--(1) For the purpose of carrying out the duties of the division, an adjunct prosecutor may use the facilities, resources and personnel of the Attorney General, including investigators, attorneys and necessary experts, to assist with a criminal investigation or prosecution.(2) An adjunct prosecutor may request assistance from the Pennsylvania State Police or any law enforcement agency 20250HB1186PN1335 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 with appropriate jurisdiction in carrying out the functions of the adjunct prosecutor. The Pennsylvania State Police or any law enforcement agency with appropriate jurisdiction may provide assistance, including the use of resources and personnel necessary, for the adjunct prosecutor to perform the duties specified in this subchapter.§ 8738. Standing.A person charged with a violation of the law by an adjunct prosecutor has no standing to challenge the authority of the adjunct prosecutor to prosecute the case. If a person makes a challenge to the adjunct prosecutor's authority, the challenge shall be dismissed and no relief shall be available in the courts of this Commonwealth to the person.§ 8739. Adjunct Prosecutor Division Restricted Account.(a) Establishment.--The Adjunct Prosecutor Division Restricted Account is established in the State Treasury.(b) Source of funding.--The account shall consist of money appropriated by the General Assembly to the account and interest earned on money in the account.(c) Duty of Attorney General.--The Attorney General shall submit an annual request for an appropriation from the account under Article VI of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(d) Lapsing.--An appropriation from the account shall lapse to the General Fund in accordance with section 621 of The Administrative Code of 1929.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1186PN1335 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627